Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2954
No liability as director for limited cooperative association's obligations.

An obligation of a limited cooperative association, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is not the obligation of a director. A director is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for an obligation of the limited cooperative association solely by reason of being a director.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 54.